Tennessee, session 114, SB1036.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 55, Chapter 50, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
55-50-103.
Notwithstanding another law to the contrary, all driver licenses and photo
identification licenses must be manufactured and printed in this state. The department
shall review and determine the cost-effectiveness of having such licenses manufactured
and printed by the department or another state department or agency or through a
contract with a private vendor. The department shall have licenses manufactured and
printed in this state using the most cost-effective means.
SECTION 2. For purposes of review and determining cost-effectiveness, including
evaluating current contracts and vendors, this act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public
welfare requiring it. For all other purposes, this act takes effect January 1, 2026, the public
welfare requiring it.
SB1036
003043
- 1 -